Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-701
Minority; effect.

The disability of minority of any person otherwise eligible for a loan or for guaranty or insurance of a loan pursuant to the Act of the Congress of the United States entitled the Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944, as heretofore or hereafter amended, and of the minor spouse of any eligible veteran in connection with any transaction entered into pursuant to such Act of the Congress of the United States, as heretofore or hereafter amended, shall not affect the binding effect of any obligation incurred by such eligible person or spouse as an incident to any such transaction, including incurring of indebtedness and acquiring, encumbering, selling, releasing, or conveying property or any interest therein, if all or part of any such obligation is guaranteed or insured by the federal government or the Secretary of Veterans Affairs pursuant to the act and amendments thereto or, if the secretary is the creditor, by reason of a loan or a sale pursuant to such act and amendments thereto. This section shall not create or render enforceable any other or greater rights or liabilities than would exist if neither such person nor such spouse were a minor.

Laws 1953, c. 327, § 1, p. 1081;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 29.